Maryland, session 2025, SB0096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
SUBTITLE 27. WATER BOTTLE FILLING STATIONS.
9–2701.
IN THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) “WATER BOTTLE FILLING STATION” MEANS A PLUMBING FIXTURE
CONNECTED TO THE POTABLE WATER DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM AND SANITARY
DRAINAGE SYSTEM THAT IS DESIGNED AND INTENDED FOR FILLING PERSONAL USE
WATER BOTTLES OR CONTAINERS AT LEAST 10 INCHES IN HEIGHT; AND
(2) “WATER BOTTLE FILLING STATION” INCLUDES:
(I) A STATION THAT IS SEPARATE FROM OR INTEGRAL TO A
DRINKING FOUNTAIN; AND
(II) A FOR AN INTERIOR LOCATION OF A BUILDING, A STATION
THAT INCORPORATES A WATER FILTER AND COOLING SYSTEM FOR CHILLING THE
WATER.
– 1 –

Ch. 548 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
9–2702.
(A) BEGINNING EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION, BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2025, A AT LEAST ONE WATER BOTTLE FILLING
STATION OR A COMBINED WATER BOTTLE FILLING STATION AND DRINKING
FOUNTAIN SHALL:
(1) BE INSTALLED IN ALL NEW CONSTRUCTION FOR EACH AT EACH
LOCATION WHERE A DRINKING FOUNTAIN IS REQUIRED UNDER THE CURRENT
VERSION OF THE INTERNATIONAL PLUMBING CODE ADOPTED BY THE STATE OR
STATE OR LOCAL LAW OR REGULATION;
(2) REPLACE A DRINKING FOUNTAIN LOCATED IN AN AREA OF A
BUILDING UNDERGOING A RENOVATION IF THE RENOVATION INCLUDES REPLACING
THE DRINKING FOUNTAIN; AND
(3) BE INSTALLED IN ANY BUILDING UNDERGOING A RENOVATION IF
THE INSTALLATION OF A DRINKING FOUNTAIN IS REQUIRED UNDER THE CURRENT
VERSION OF THE INTERNATIONAL PLUMBING CODE ADOPTED BY THE STATE OR
STATE OR LOCAL LAW OR REGULATION.
(B) THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION DO NOT APPLY
IF:
(1) A DRINKING FOUNTAIN IN A BUILDING LOCATED IN A
COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL AREA IS REPLACED WITH NO OTHER RENOVATIONS
MADE; OR
(2) A BUILDING LOCATED IN A COMMERCIAL OR INDUSTRIAL AREA
HAS POTABLE WATER AVAILABLE THROUGH A SOURCE OTHER THAN A DRINKING
FOUNTAIN, INCLUDING A KITCHEN.
9–2703.
THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any new construction under contract before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 548
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –